Indiana, session 2026, HB1059.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-26-5-48 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 48. (a) As used in this section, "school bus" has the
meaning set forth in IC 20-27-2-8.
(b) A school corporation may display commercial advertising on
a school bus owned by the school corporation if the governing body
of the school corporation adopts a policy that meets the following
requirements:
(1) The policy includes the following restrictions regarding the
display of commercial advertising:
(A) Commercial advertising is permitted only on the rear
quarter panels of a school bus.
(B) Not more than two (2) advertisements on each rear
quarter panel described in clause (A) are permitted.
(C) The size of commercial advertising on each quarter
panel may not exceed thirty-six (36) inches in height and
ninety (90) inches in length, including any border or
2026 IN 1059—LS 6443/DI 110


framing.
(D) The commercial advertising may consist of only black
lettering on a white background.
(E) The commercial advertising may not cover any
structural or sheet metal damage or alteration.
(F) The commercial advertising may not include the
following:
(i) Tobacco or alcohol products.
(ii) Political campaign advertising.
(iii) Advertising related to gambling.
(iv) Advertising that is sexually explicit or pornographic.
(2) The policy includes standards regarding the following:
(A) The amount the school corporation will charge for the
commercial advertising.
(B) The designation of one (1) or more individuals who
have the authority to sell and approve the commercial
advertising.
(C) The commercial advertising that the governing body
considers appropriate.
(D) Specifications regarding how the advertising will be
attached, if not painted on the school bus.
2026 IN 1059—LS 6443/DI 110